Washington statutes.
RCW 19.27.067

Temporary worker housing—Exemption—Standards.

(1) Temporary worker housing shall be constructed, altered, or repaired as provided in chapter 70.114A RCW and chapter 37, Laws of 1998. The construction, alteration, or repair of temporary worker housing is not subject to the codes adopted under RCW 19.27.031, except as provided by rule adopted under chapter 70.114A RCW or chapter 37, Laws of 1998.

(2) For the purpose of this section, "temporary worker housing" has the same meaning as provided in RCW 70.114A.020.

(3) This section is applicable to temporary worker housing as of the date of the final adoption of the temporary worker building code by the department of health under RCW 70.114A.081.

[ 1998 c 37 s 1.]